Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2046.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-2,239 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 40-2,239. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 40
of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto, travel
insurance shall be classified and filed for purposes of rates and forms
under an inland marine line of insurance. Travel insurance that provides
coverage for sickness, accident, disability or death occurring during
travel either exclusively, or in conjunction with related coverages of
emergency evacuation or repatriation of remains, may be classified and
filed under either an accident and health or an inland marine line of
insurance.
(b) Travel insurance may be in the form of an individual, group or
blanket policy.
(c) Eligibility and underwriting standards for travel insurance may be
developed and provided based on travel protection plans designed for
individual or identified marketing or distribution channels, provided if
those standards also meet underwriting standards of the state for inland
marine insurance.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-2,239 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book Kansas register.